apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="गेह/ूँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूँ</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुँओं</l><r>ूँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="नकल__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ख/ाँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ाँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="वध/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुयें</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जु/आ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="बिटि/आ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>आँ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="क/ई__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="अडबंग__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="खुशब/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुयें</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कला/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->        

    <pardef n="गलत__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="बालक__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जड__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ऐसी/आ__adj">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कुछ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

	<e lm="रजाई"><i>रजा</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="कठिनाई"><i>कठिना</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="महाधमनीई"><i>महाधमनी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="दस्तंदाज़ीई"><i>दस्तंदाज़ी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="पंखुड्ॅई"><i>पंखुड्ॅ</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="सेमीई"><i>सेमी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="धोखेबाज़ीई"><i>धोखेबाज़ी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="शीर्षणीई"><i>शीर्षणी</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="तमाशाई"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="बढ़ई"><i>बढ़</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="नेकटाई"><i>नेकटा</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अँबराई"><i>अँबरा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="भ्रातावधू"><i>भ्रातावध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अडबंग"><i>अडबंग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नकल"><i>नकल</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गफलत"><i>गफलत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रजाई"><i>रजा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दाई"><i>दा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हकीकत"><i>हकीकत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बलवाई"><i>बलवा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लुनाई"><i>लुना</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तफतीश"><i>तफतीश</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शुक्तिवधू"><i>शुक्तिवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मियाँ"><i>मिय</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तमाशाई"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरात"><i>खैरात</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अधपई"><i>अधप</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रोयाँ"><i>रोय</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="महासभाई"><i>महासभा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पतोहू"><i>पतोह</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सूई"><i>सू</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कुलवधू"><i>कुलवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खाँ"><i>ख</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सेँवई"><i>सेँव</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बहनोई"><i>बहनो</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="महाचमू"><i>महाचम</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाई"><i>भा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कमान"><i>कमान</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बडा"><i>बड</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडे"><i>बडे</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जोरू"><i>जोर</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्फ"><i>बर्फ</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सलाई"><i>सला</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरियत"><i>खैरियत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बिटिआ"><i>बिटि</i><par n="बिटि/आ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पुत्रवधू"><i>पुत्रवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="चारपाई"><i>चारपा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खुशबू"><i>खुशब</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आरजू"><i>आरज</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="डाई"><i>डा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कसाई"><i>कसा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शराफत"><i>शराफत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जुआ"><i>जु</i><par n="जु/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बहू"><i>बह</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गेहूँ"><i>गेह</i><par n="गेह/ूँ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="शौक्त्तिक"><i>शौक्त्तिक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="रोगनिरोधी"><i>रोगनिरोधी</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पारलौकिक"><i>पारलौकिक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वाक्प्रसारीआ"><i>वाक्प्रसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ताजीआ"><i>ताजी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नाजिर"><i>नाजिर</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूखीआ"><i>सूखी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गरम"><i>गरम</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अच्छा"><i>अच्छा</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडीआ"><i>बडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छमछम"><i>छमछम</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्य"><i>वर्य</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जैसीआ"><i>जैसी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नितांत"><i>नितांत</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूडीआ"><i>बूडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अश्वारूढ"><i>अश्वारूढ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चमकदार"><i>चमकदार</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उठल्लूआ"><i>उठल्लू</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खुश"><i>खुश</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धुआँधार"><i>धुआँधार</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माध्यम"><i>माध्यम</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बालक"><i>बालक</i><par n="बालक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तद्देशीय"><i>तद्देशीय</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्म"><i>गर्म</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुराना"><i>पुराना</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछ"><i>कुछ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असंसारीआ"><i>असंसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठंडा"><i>ठंडा</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
